Tennessee, session 114, HB1006.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-8-201(f)(6), is amended by
deleting subdivision (D) and substituting:
(D) Members of a governing body for another institution of higher education.
SECTION 2.
If, on the effective date of this act, a state university board member is serving on
the governing board for another institution of higher education, then the member's seat
on the state university board is vacated on the effective date of this act. The appropriate
appointing authority shall fill the vacancy for the remainder of the term.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1006
002851
- 1 -